Hawaii statutes.
[§11‑6] Petitions; withdrawal
of signatures. Wherever in this chapter the signatures of registered
voters are required on a petition, any voter who, after signing a petition,
seeks to withdraw the voter's signature may do so by providing notice in writing
to the chief election officer any time before the filing of the petition. The
notice shall include the name, social security number, address, and birthdate
of the voter and must be signed by the voter with the name under which the
voter is registered to vote. Upon receipt of that notice containing the
information required by this section, the chief election officer shall notify
the group or individual to whom the petition was issued and the signature of
the individual shall not be counted. [L 1993, c 304, §1]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next